Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.075

Appointments to positions created by 1977 ex.s. c 49 s 1—Election—Terms of office.

The new judicial positions created pursuant to section 1, chapter 49, Laws of 1977 ex. sess. shall become effective January 1, 1978 and shall be filled by gubernatorial appointment as follows:

(1) Two shall be appointed to the first division, District 1, King county;

(2) One shall be appointed to the second division, District 1, Pierce county; and

(3) One shall be appointed to the third division, District 1, Ferry, Lincoln, Okanogan, Pend Oreille, Spokane, and Stevens counties.

The persons appointed by the governor shall hold office until the general election to be held in November 1978. Upon taking office the two newly appointed judges in Division 1 shall determine by lot the length of term they will be entitled to run for in the general election of 1977. One term will be for one year or until the second Monday in January 1980, and the other for three years or until the second Monday in January 1982, and until their successors are elected and qualified. Thereafter judges shall be elected for a term of six years and until their successors are elected and qualified, commencing with the second Monday in January succeeding their election. At the general election to be held in November 1978, the judges appointed in Division 2 and Division 3 shall be entitled to run for a term of six years or until the second Monday in January 1985, and until their successors are elected and qualified. Thereafter judges shall be elected for a term of six years and until their successors are elected and qualified, commencing with the second Monday in January succeeding their election.

[ 1977 ex.s. c 49 s 3.]